West Virginia, session 2026, HB4255.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Tax Department. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 31, 2025, authorized under the authority of §11-13GG-16 of this code, relating to the Tax Department (Downstream Natural Gas Manufacturing Investment Tax Credit, 110 CSR 13GG), is authorized.